California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to an authorized law enforcement representative of any city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, for exclusive use by that governmental agency if, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of these firearms, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made.

(b) Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the employee as an individual authorized to conduct the
 transaction, and authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that person is employed.

(c) Within 10 days of the date a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is acquired by the agency, a record of the same shall be entered as an institutional weapon into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 66.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

31710.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The loan is made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, or city and county, or of the state or federal government.

(b) The loan is made to a peace officer employed by that agency and authorized to carry a firearm.

(c) The loan is made for the carrying and use of that firearm by that peace officer in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31715.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a peace officer pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code to that peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold,
 delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 67.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

31720.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a retiring peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 5.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred to that retiring peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state
 agency that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 68.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

31725.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to a sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The sale, delivery, or transfer is to an authorized representative of a city, city and county, county, or state government, or of the federal government, and is for the governmental entity.

(2) The entity is acquiring the weapon as part of an authorized, voluntary program in which the entity is buying or receiving weapons from private individuals.

(b) Any weapons acquired pursuant to this section shall be disposed
 of pursuant to the applicable provisions of Section 34000 or Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31730.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, loan, or transfer of a firearm made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, to any public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, or the purchase or receipt of that firearm by that public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The entity receiving the firearm is open to the public.

(b) The firearm prior to delivery is deactivated or rendered inoperable.

(c) The firearm is not subject to any of the following:

(1) Sections 18000 and 18005.

(2) Division 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Title 2.

(3) Section 34000.

(4) Sections 34005 and 34010.

(d) The firearm is not prohibited by other provisions of law from being sold, delivered, or transferred to the public at large.

(e) Prior to delivery, the entity receiving the firearm submits a written statement to the law enforcement representative stating that the firearm will not be restored to operating condition, and will either remain with that entity, or if
 subsequently disposed of, will be transferred in accordance with the applicable provisions listed in Section 16575 and, if applicable, Section 31615.

(f) Within 10 days of the date that the firearm is sold, loaned, delivered, or transferred to that entity, all of the following information shall be reported to the department in a manner prescribed by the department:

(1) The name of the government entity delivering the firearm.

(2) The make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm.

(3) The name of the person authorized by the entity to take possession of the firearm.

(g) In the event of a change in the status of the designated
 representative, the entity shall notify the department of a new representative within 30 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31735.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, loan, or transfer of a firearm made by any person other than a representative of an authorized law enforcement agency to any public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The entity receiving the firearm is open to the public.

(b) The firearm is deactivated or rendered inoperable prior to delivery.

(c) The firearm is not of a type prohibited from being sold, delivered, or transferred to the public.

(d) Prior to delivery, the entity receiving the firearm submits a written statement to the person selling, loaning, or transferring the firearm stating that the firearm will not be restored to operating condition, and will either remain with that entity, or if subsequently disposed of, will be transferred in accordance with the applicable provisions listed in Section 16575 and, if applicable, with Section 31615.

(e) If title to a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is being transferred to the public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, then the designated representative of that entity shall, within 30 days of taking possession of that firearm, forward by prepaid mail or deliver in person to the Department of Justice, a single report signed by both parties to the transaction, which includes all of the following information:

(1) Information identifying the person representing the public or private historical society, museum, or institutional collection.

(2) Information on how title was obtained and from whom.

(3) A description of the firearm in question.

(4) A copy of the written statement referred to in subdivision (d).

(f) The report forms that are to be completed pursuant to this section shall be provided by the Department of Justice.

(g) In the event of a change in the status of the designated representative, the entity shall notify the department of a new representative within 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 69.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

31740.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to sales, deliveries, or transfers of firearms between or to importers and manufacturers of firearms licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31745.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 shall not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a handgun to a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, where the licensee is receiving the handgun in the course and scope of the licensee’s activities as a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31750.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The person loaning the firearm is at all times within the presence of the person being loaned the firearm.

(b) The loan is for a lawful purpose.

(c) The loan does not exceed three days in duration.

(d) The individual receiving the firearm is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning,
 or purchasing a firearm.

(e) The person loaning the firearm is 18 years of age or older.

(f) The person being loaned the firearm is 18 years of age or older.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31755.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the delivery of a firearm to a gunsmith for service or repair, or to the return of the firearm to its owner by the gunsmith, or to the delivery of a firearm by a gunsmith to a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code for service or repair and the return of the firearm to the gunsmith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31760.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made by a person who resides in this state.

(b) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made to a person who resides outside this state and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(c) The sale, delivery, or transfer is in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United
 States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31765.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of a firearm to a person 18 years of age or older for the purposes of shooting at targets if the loan occurs on the premises of a target facility that holds a business or regulatory license or on the premises of any club or organization organized for the purposes of practicing shooting at targets upon established ranges, whether public or private, if the firearm is at all times kept within the premises of the target range or on the premises of the club or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31770.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to deliveries, transfers, or returns of firearms made pursuant to any of the following:

(a) Sections 18000 and 18005.

(b) Division 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Title 2.

(c) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11.

(d) Sections 34005 and 34010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31780.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of unloaded firearms by a dealer to a person who resides outside this state and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31785.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of unloaded firearms to a wholesaler if the firearms are being returned to the wholesaler and are intended as merchandise in the wholesaler’s business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31790.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The firearms are unloaded.

(b) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made by one dealer to another dealer, upon proof of compliance with the requirements of Section 27555.

(c) The firearms are intended as merchandise in the receiving dealer’s business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31800.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of an unloaded firearm by a dealer who also operates a target facility that holds a business or regulatory license on the premises of the building designated in the license or whose building designated in the license is on the premises of any club or organization organized for the purposes of practicing shooting at targets upon established ranges, whether public or private, to a person at that target facility or that club or organization, if the firearm is at all times kept within the premises of the target range or on the premises of the club or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31805.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of unloaded firearms to a wholesaler as merchandise in the wholesaler’s business by a manufacturer or importer licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, or by another wholesaler, if the sale, delivery, or transfer is made in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31810.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to or affect the following circumstances:

(a) The loan of a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2015, any firearm, to a minor by the minor’s parent or legal guardian, if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The minor is being loaned the firearm for the purposes of engaging in a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity
 or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(2) The duration of the loan does not exceed the amount of time that is reasonably necessary to engage in the lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(b) The loan of a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2015, any firearm,
 to a minor by a person who is not the minor’s parent or legal guardian, if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The minor is accompanied by the minor’s parent or legal guardian when the loan is made, or the minor has the written consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian, which is presented at the time of the loan, or earlier.

(2) The minor is being loaned the firearm for the purpose of engaging in a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(3) The duration of the loan does not exceed the amount of time that is reasonably necessary to engage in the lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(4) The duration of the loan does not, in any event, exceed 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 38.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

31815.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The loan is infrequent, as defined in Section 16730.

(b) The firearm is unloaded.

(c) The loan is made by a person who is neither a dealer nor a federal firearms licensee pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(d) The loan is made to a person 18 years of age or older.

(e) The loan
 is for use solely as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31820.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is unloaded.

(2) The loan is made by a person who is not a dealer but is a federal firearms licensee pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(3) The loan is made to a person who possesses a valid entertainment firearms permit issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8.

(4) The
 firearm is loaned for use solely as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(b) The person loaning the firearm pursuant to this section shall retain a photocopy of the entertainment firearms permit as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31825.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is unloaded.

(2) The loan is made by a dealer.

(3) The loan is made to a person who possesses a valid entertainment firearms permit issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8.

(4) The firearm is loaned solely for use as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(b) The dealer shall retain a photocopy of the entertainment firearms permit as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31830.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of an unloaded firearm to a consultant-evaluator by a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, if the loan does not exceed 45 days from the date of delivery.

(b) At the time of the loan, the consultant-evaluator shall provide the following information, which the dealer shall retain for two years:

(1) A photocopy of a valid, current, government-issued identification to determine the consultant-evaluator’s identity, including, but not limited to, a California driver’s license, identification card, or passport.

(2) A photocopy of the consultant-evaluator’s valid, current certificate of eligibility.

(3) A letter from the person licensed as an importer, manufacturer, or dealer pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code, with whom the consultant-evaluator has a bona fide business relationship. The letter shall detail the bona fide business purposes for which the firearm is being loaned and confirm that the consultant-evaluator is being loaned the firearm as part of a bona fide business relationship.

(4) The signature of the consultant-evaluator on a form indicating the date the firearm is loaned and the last day the firearm may be returned.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31833.

(a) Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of a firearm other than a handgun or semiautomatic centerfire rifle to a minor that complies with all of the conditions set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 27505.

(b) Section 31615 does not apply to the loan of a firearm other than a handgun or semiautomatic centerfire rifle to a minor that complies with all of the conditions set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 27505.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 26.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31834.

Section 31615 does not apply to sales, deliveries, or transfers of firearms between or to importers and manufacturers of ammunition licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, where those firearms are to be used in the course and scope of the licensee’s activities as a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 27.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31835.

Subdivision (a) of Section 31615 does not apply to the delivery, sale, or transfer of firearms when made by authorized law enforcement representatives for cities, counties, cities and counties, or of the state or federal government, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made to one of the persons or entities identified in subdivision (a) of Section 26620. 

(b) The sale, delivery, or transfer of the firearm is not subject to the procedures set forth in Section 18000, 18005, 34000, or 34005.

(c) The sale, delivery, or
 transfer of the firearm follows the procedures set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 26620.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 738, Sec. 10.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. “Unsafe Handgun” and Related Definitions [31900. - 31910.]

31900.

As used in this part, the “drop safety requirement for handguns” means that at the conclusion of the firing requirements for handguns described in Section 31905, the same certified independent testing laboratory shall subject the same three handguns of the make and model for which certification is sought, to the following test:

(a) A primed case (no powder or projectile) shall be inserted into the chamber. For a pistol, the slide shall be released, allowing it to move forward under the impetus of the recoil spring, and an empty magazine shall be inserted. For both a pistol and a revolver, the weapon shall be placed in a drop fixture capable of dropping the pistol from a drop height of 1m + 1cm (39.4 + 0.4 in.) onto
 the largest side of a slab of solid concrete having minimum dimensions of 7.5 x 15 x 15 cm (3 x 6 x 6 in.). The drop distance shall be measured from the lowermost portion of the weapon to the top surface of the slab. The weapon shall be dropped from a fixture and not from the hand. The weapon shall be dropped in the condition that it would be in if it were dropped from a hand (cocked with no manual safety applied). If the pistol is designed so that upon leaving the hand a “safety” is automatically applied by the pistol, this feature shall not be defeated. An approved drop fixture is a short piece of string with the weapon attached at one end and the other end held in an air vise until the drop is initiated.

(b) The following six drops shall be performed:

(1) Normal firing position with barrel horizontal.

(2) Upside
 down with barrel horizontal.

(3) On grip with barrel vertical.

(4) On muzzle with barrel vertical.

(5) On either side with barrel horizontal.

(6) If there is an exposed hammer or striker, on the rearmost point of that device, otherwise on the rearmost point of the weapon.

(c) The primer shall be examined for indentations after each drop. If indentations are present, a fresh primed case shall be used for the next drop.

(d) The handgun shall pass this test if each of the three test guns does not fire the primer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31905.

(a) As used in this part, “firing requirement for handguns” means a test in which the manufacturer provides three handguns of the make and model for which certification is sought to an independent testing laboratory certified by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 32010. These handguns may not be refined or modified in any way from those that would be made available for retail sale if certification is granted. The magazines of a tested pistol shall be identical to those that would be provided with the pistol to a retail customer.

(b) The test shall be conducted as follows:

(1) The laboratory shall fire 600 rounds from each
 gun, stopping after each series of 50 rounds has been fired for 5 to 10 minutes to allow the weapon to cool, stopping after each series of 100 rounds has been fired to tighten any loose screws and clean the gun in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions, and stopping as needed to refill the empty magazine or cylinder to capacity before continuing.

(2) The ammunition used shall be of the type recommended by the handgun manufacturer in the user manual, or if none is recommended, any standard ammunition of the correct caliber in new condition that is commercially available.

(c) A handgun shall pass this test if each of the three test guns meets both of the following:

(1) Fires the first 20 rounds without a malfunction that is not due to ammunition that fails to detonate.

(2) Fires the full 600 rounds with no more than six malfunctions that are not due to ammunition that fails to detonate and without any crack or breakage of an operating part of the handgun that increases the risk of injury to the user.

(d) If a pistol or revolver fails the requirements of either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (c) due to ammunition that fails to detonate, the pistol or revolver shall be retested from the beginning of the “firing requirement for handguns” test. A new model of the pistol or revolver that failed due to ammunition that fails to detonate may be submitted for the test to replace the pistol or revolver that failed.

(e) As used in this section, “malfunction” means a failure to properly feed, fire, or eject a round, or failure of a pistol to accept or eject the magazine, or failure of a
 pistol’s slide to remain open after the magazine has been expended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31910.

(a) As used in this part, “unsafe handgun” means any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, for which any of the following is true:

(1) For a revolver:

(A) It does not have a safety device that, either automatically in the case of a double-action firing mechanism, or by manual operation in the case of a single-action firing mechanism, causes the hammer to retract to a point where the firing pin does not rest upon the primer of the cartridge.

(B) It does not meet the firing requirement for handguns.

(C) It does not meet the drop safety requirement for handguns.

(2) For a pistol:

(A) It does not have a positive manually operated safety device, as determined by standards relating to imported guns promulgated by the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.

(B) It does not meet the firing requirement for handguns.

(C) It does not meet the drop safety requirement for handguns.

(D) Commencing July 1, 2022, for all centerfire semiautomatic pistols that are not already listed on the roster pursuant to Section 32015, it does not
 have a chamber load indicator.

(E) Commencing July 1, 2022, for all centerfire or rimfire semiautomatic pistols that are not already listed on the roster pursuant to Section 32015, it does not have a magazine disconnect mechanism if it has a detachable magazine.

(b) The Department of Justice shall, for each semiautomatic pistol newly added to the roster pursuant to Section 32015, remove from the roster exactly three semiautomatic pistols lacking one or more of the applicable features described in subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and added to the roster before July 1, 2022. Notwithstanding those subparagraphs, each semiautomatic pistol removed from the roster pursuant to this subdivision shall be considered an unsafe handgun. The Attorney
 General shall remove semiautomatic pistols from the roster pursuant to this subdivision in reverse order of their dates of addition to the roster, beginning with the semiautomatic pistol added to the roster on the earliest date and continuing until each semiautomatic pistol on the roster includes each of the applicable features described in those subparagraphs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 253, Sec. 7.   (SB 452)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Rules Governing Unsafe Handguns [32000. - 32030.]

32000.

(a) (1) A person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state for sale, keeps for sale, offers or exposes for sale, gives, or lends an unsafe handgun shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(2) The failure to report to the Department of Justice in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) the sale or transfer of an unsafe handgun obtained pursuant to paragraph (4), (6), or (7) of subdivision (b) may be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(3) In addition to any criminal penalty provided in paragraph (1), the unlawful sale or transfer of an unsafe
 handgun obtained pursuant to paragraph (4), (6), or (7) of subdivision (b) may be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) The manufacture in this state, or importation into this state, of a prototype handgun when the manufacture or importation is for the sole purpose of allowing an independent laboratory certified by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 32010 to conduct an independent test to determine whether that handgun is prohibited by Sections 31900 to 32110, inclusive, and, if not, allowing the department to add the firearm to the roster of handguns that may be sold in this state pursuant to Section 32015.

(2) The importation or lending of a handgun by employees or authorized agents of entities determining
 whether the weapon is prohibited by this section.

(3) Firearms listed as curios or relics, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) The sale or purchase of a handgun, if the handgun is sold to, or purchased by, the Department of Justice, a police department, a sheriff’s official, a marshal’s office, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, any district attorney’s office, any federal law enforcement agency, or the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States for use in the discharge of their official duties. This section does not prohibit the sale to, or purchase by, sworn members of these agencies of a handgun.

(5) The sale, purchase, or delivery of a handgun, if the sale, purchase, or delivery of the
 handgun is made pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(6) Subject to the limitations set forth in subdivision (c), the sale or purchase of a handgun for use as a service weapon, if the handgun is sold to, or purchased by, any of the following entities for use by, or sold to or purchased by, sworn members of these entities who have satisfactorily completed the POST basic course or, before January 1, 2021, have satisfactorily completed the firearms portion of a training course prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training (POST) pursuant to Section 832, and who, as a condition of carrying that handgun, complete a live-fire qualification prescribed by their employing entity at least once every six months:

(A) The Department of Parks and Recreation.

(B) The
 Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(C) The Division of Investigation of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(D) The Department of Motor Vehicles.

(E) The Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance.

(F) The State Department of State Hospitals.

(G) The Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(H) The State Department of Developmental Services.

(I) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(J) A county probation department.

(K) The Los Angeles World Airports, as defined in Section 830.15.

(L) A K–12 public school district for use by a school police officer, as described in Section 830.32.

(M) A municipal water district for use by a park ranger, as described in Section 830.34.

(N) A county for use by a welfare fraud investigator or inspector, as described in Section 830.35.

(O) A county for use by the coroner or the deputy coroner, as described in Section 830.35.

(P) The Supreme Court and the courts of appeal for use by marshals of the Supreme Court and bailiffs of the courts of appeal, and coordinators of security for the judicial branch, as described in Section 830.36.

(Q) A fire department or fire protection agency of a county, city, city and county, district, or the state for use by either of the following:

(i) A member of an arson-investigating unit, regularly paid and employed in that capacity pursuant to Section 830.37.

(ii) A member other than a member of an arson-investigating unit, regularly paid and employed in that capacity pursuant to Section 830.37.

(R) The University of California Police Department, or the California State University Police Departments, as described in Section 830.2.

(S) A California Community College police department, as described in Section 830.32.

(T) A harbor
 or port district or other entity employing peace officers described in subdivision (b) of Section 830.33, the San Diego Unified Port District Harbor Police, and the Harbor Department of the City of Los Angeles.

(U) A local agency employing park rangers described in subdivision (b) of Section 830.31.

(V) The Department of Cannabis Control.

(7) (A) Subject to the limitations set forth in subdivision (c), the sale or purchase of a handgun, if the handgun is sold to, or purchased by, any of the following entities for use as a service weapon by the sworn members of these entities who have satisfactorily completed the POST basic course or, before January 1, 2021, have satisfactorily completed the firearms portion of a training course prescribed by the POST pursuant to Section 832, and who, as a
 condition of carrying that handgun, complete a live-fire qualification prescribed by their employing entity at least once every six months:

(i) The California Horse Racing Board.

(ii) The State Department of Health Care Services.

(iii) The State Department of Public Health.

(iv) The State Department of Social Services.

(v) The Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(vi) The Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(vii) The Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(viii) The Department of
 Housing and Community Development.

(ix) Investigators of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.
